Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE G. CORRECTIONS

CHAPTER 507. STATE JAIL DIVISION

SUBCHAPTER A. STATE JAIL FELONY FACILITIES

Sec. 507.001. AUTHORITY TO OPERATE OR CONTRACT FOR STATE JAIL FELONY FACILITIES. (a) The state jail division may operate, maintain, and manage state jail felony facilities to confine inmates described by Section 507.002, and the department may finance and construct those facilities. The state jail division, with the approval of the board, may contract with the institutional division, a private vendor, a community supervision and corrections department, or the commissioners court of a county for the construction, operation, maintenance, or management of a state jail felony facility. The community justice assistance division shall assist the state jail division to contract with a community supervision and corrections department for the construction, operation, maintenance, or management of a state jail felony facility. The state jail division shall consult with the community justice assistance division before contracting with a community supervision and corrections department under this section. A community supervision and corrections department or the commissioners court of a county that contracts under this section may subcontract with a private vendor for the provision of any or all services described by this subsection. A community supervision and corrections department that contracts under this section may subcontract with the commissioners court of a county for the provision of any or all services described by this subsection. The board may contract with a private vendor or the commissioners court of a county for the financing or construction of a state jail felony facility.

(b) The community justice assistance division and the state jail division shall develop and implement work programs and programs of rehabilitation, education, and recreation in state jail felony facilities. For each state jail felony facility, the community justice assistance division and the state jail division shall consult with the community supervision and corrections departments and the community justice councils served by the facility in developing programs in that facility, and shall develop the programs in a manner that makes appropriate use of facilities and personnel of the community supervision and corrections departments. In developing the programs, the state jail division and the community justice assistance division shall attempt to structure programs so that they are operated on a 90-day cycle, although the divisions should deviate from a 90-day schedule as necessary to meet the requirements of a particular program.

(c) Services described by Subsection (a) must be provided in compliance with standards established by the board. Programs described by Subsection (b) must be provided in compliance with minimum requirements established under Subsection (b).

(d) A state jail felony facility authorized by this subchapter may be located on private land or on land owned by the federal government, the state, a community supervision and corrections department, or a political subdivision of the state. The board may accept land donated for that purpose.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1051 , Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2015.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 988, Sec. 1.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.097, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1051 (H.B. 1930), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 507.002. ELIGIBLE DEFENDANTS. The state jail division may confine in a state jail felony facility authorized by this subchapter defendants required by a judge to serve a term of confinement in a state jail felony facility following a grant of deferred adjudication for or conviction of an offense punishable as a state jail felony.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 988, Sec. 1.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 318, Sec. 72, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 507.003. REGIONS. The board shall designate not fewer than nine regions in the state for the purpose of providing regional state jail felony facilities. The board shall ensure that regions are designed to efficiently serve community supervision and corrections departments. The board may not designate a region that contains a part of an area served by a community supervision and corrections department. The board may designate a region that contains only one judicial district, but only if the judicial district serves a municipality with a population of 400,000 or more. Any other provision of law that would otherwise require the board to designate regions on the basis of uniform service regions does not apply to this section.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 988, Sec. 1.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 507.004. ALLOCATION POLICIES. The board shall adopt and enforce:

(1) a regional allocation policy to allocate the number of facilities and beds to each region established under Section 507.003; and

(2) an intra-regional allocation policy for each region, to allocate the number of facilities and beds within a region to the community supervision and corrections departments in that region, unless those departments by their own agreement establish the allocation of beds in the region.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 988, Sec. 1.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 507.006. USE OF FACILITY FOR OTHER INMATES. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, the state jail division, with the approval of the board, may designate one or more state jail felony facilities to treat inmates who are eligible for confinement in a substance abuse felony punishment facility under Section 493.009 or to house inmates who are sentenced to imprisonment in the institutional division, but only if the designation does not deny placement in a state jail felony facility of defendants required to serve terms of confinement in a facility following conviction of state jail felonies. The division may not house in a state jail felony facility an inmate who:

(1) has a history of or has shown a pattern of violent or assaultive behavior in county jail or a facility operated by the department; or

(2) will increase the likelihood of harm to the public if housed in the facility.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 126 (H.B. 719), Sec. 9(2), eff. September 1, 2021.

(c) The responsibility of the department to provide substance abuse felony punishment facilities is governed by the General Appropriations Act and Section 493.009. This section does not affect the responsibility of the department to provide substance abuse felony punishment facilities.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 988, Sec. 1.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1993. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.098, 1.113, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 488, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 126 (H.B. 719), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 126 (H.B. 719), Sec. 9(2), eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 831 (H.B. 2201), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER B. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 507.022. EMPLOYEES' SALARIES, ROOM AND BOARD, AND MEDICAL CARE. (a) Salaries of employees of the state jail division and the provision of board, lodging, uniforms, and other provisions to employees are as provided by the General Appropriations Act.

(b) Employees of the state jail division who are injured in the line of duty are entitled to receive free medical care and hospitalization from institutional division doctors and the institutional division hospital.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 988, Sec. 1.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 507.023. AIDS AND HIV EDUCATION; TESTING. (a) The state jail division shall establish and provide education programs to educate state jail division employees and defendants in state jail felony facilities about AIDS and HIV in the same manner as the institutional division establishes and provides programs for employees and inmates under Section 501.054.

(b) The state jail division shall adopt a policy for handling a defendant with AIDS or HIV and shall test a defendant for AIDS or HIV in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as apply to the institutional division under Section 501.054.

(c) In this section, "AIDS" and "HIV" have the meanings assigned by Section 81.101, Health and Safety Code.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 988, Sec. 1.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1184 (H.B. 43), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 507.024. TRANSPORTATION OF DEFENDANTS. The board shall adopt rules to provide for the safe transfer of defendants from counties to state jail felony facilities. A sheriff may transport defendants to a state jail felony facility if the sheriff is able to perform the service as economically as if the service were performed by the division. The state jail division is responsible for the cost of transportation of defendants to the division. Defendants may be transported with other persons being transported to the custody of the department provided appropriate security precautions prescribed by policies of the department are taken.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 988, Sec. 1.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 507.025. MEDICAL CARE. The state jail division, with the approval of the board, may contract with the institutional division, a private vendor, or any public health care provider for the provision of medical services to defendants in state jail felony facilities.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 988, Sec. 1.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 507.026. CHANGE IN DESIGNATION OF FACILITY. The board may designate any facility under its control as a state jail felony facility and confine state jail felons in that facility.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 988, Sec. 1.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 507.027. INSPECTIONS. The board shall adopt rules relating to inspections by the department of state jail felony facility construction projects.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 988, Sec. 1.07, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 507.028. SCREENING FOR AND EDUCATION CONCERNING FETAL ALCOHOL EXPOSURE DURING PREGNANCY. (a) The department shall establish and use a screening program in state jail felony facilities that is substantially similar to the program established and used by the department under Section 501.059.

(b) The department shall provide to all female defendants confined in state jail felony facilities an educational brochure describing the risks and dangers of consuming alcohol during pregnancy.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 32, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 507.029. USE OF INMATE LABOR. The department may use the labor of inmates of the institutional division in any work or community service program or project performed by the state jail division.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.100, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 507.030. VISITATION. (a) In this section:

(1) "Guardian" has the meaning assigned by Section 1002.012, Estates Code.

(2) "Letters of guardianship" means a certificate issued under Section 1106.001(a), Estates Code.

(a-1) The state jail division shall allow the governor, members of the legislature, and officials of the executive and judicial branches to enter during business hours any part of a facility operated by the division, for the purpose of observing the operations of the division. A visitor described by this subsection may talk with defendants away from division employees.

(b) The state jail division shall establish a visitation policy for persons confined in state jail felony facilities. The visitation policy must:

(1) allow visitation by a guardian of a defendant confined in a state jail felony facility to the same extent as the defendant's next of kin, including placing the guardian on the defendant's approved visitors list on the guardian's request and providing the guardian access to the defendant during a facility's standard visitation hours if the defendant is otherwise eligible to receive visitors; and

(2) require the guardian to provide the director of the facility with letters of guardianship before being allowed to visit the defendant.

(c) Regardless of the implementation of video visitation or visitation by other electronic means, the visitation policy must allow in-person visitation for defendants who are eligible to receive visitors, provided that the policy may allow the temporary suspension of in-person visitation for a health or safety emergency.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.101, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 688 (H.B. 634), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 328 (H.B. 2708), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 507.031. FURLOUGH PROGRAM. (a) The director of a state jail felony facility may grant a furlough to a defendant so that the defendant may:

(1) obtain a medical diagnosis or medical treatment;

(2) obtain treatment and supervision at a facility operated by the Health and Human Services Commission;

(3) attend a funeral or visit a critically ill relative; or

(4) participate in a programmatic activity sanctioned by the state jail division.

(b) The state jail division shall adopt policies for the administration of the furlough program.

(c) A defendant furloughed under this section is considered to be in the custody of the state jail division, even if the defendant is not under physical guard while furloughed.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 321, Sec. 1.099, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Renumbered from Government Code Sec. 507.028 by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 31.01(43), eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 446), Sec. 5.16, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 507.032. IDENTIFICATION OF DEFENDANTS SUBJECT TO ARREST WARRANT. Before a defendant is released from confinement in a state jail felony facility, the department shall conduct a criminal history record check to determine whether the defendant is the subject of an arrest warrant. In conducting the criminal history record check, the department shall allow sufficient time for compliance with any requirements related to notifying the proper authorities of the defendant's release and, if necessary, processing a demand for extradition of the defendant.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 205, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 507.033. REHABILITATION PROGRAMS. (a) The state jail division may allow a defendant who is capable of serving as a tutor to tutor functionally illiterate defendants and shall actively encourage volunteer organizations to aid in the tutoring of defendants. A person who acts as a tutor may function only as a teacher and advisor to a defendant and may not exercise supervisory authority or control over the defendant.

(b) The state jail division shall actively encourage volunteer organizations to provide the following programs for defendants who are housed in facilities operated by or under contract with the division:

(1) literacy and education programs;

(2) life skills programs;

(3) job skills programs;

(4) parent-training programs;

(5) drug and alcohol rehabilitation programs;

(6) support group programs;

(7) arts and crafts programs; and

(8) other programs determined by the division to aid defendants confined in state jail felony facilities in the transition from confinement or supervision back into society and to reduce incidents of recidivism among defendants.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 391, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Sec. 507.034. VETERANS REENTRY DORM PROGRAM. (a) The department, in coordination with the Texas Veterans Commission, shall establish and administer a voluntary rehabilitation and transition program for defendants confined in state jail felony facilities:

(1) who are veterans of the United States armed forces, including veterans of the reserves, national guard, or state guard; and

(2) who suffer from a brain injury, a mental illness, a mental disorder, including post-traumatic stress disorder, or substance abuse, or were victims of military sexual trauma, as defined by Section 124.002, that:

(A) occurred during or resulted from their military service; and

(B) may have contributed to their criminal activity.

(b) The program established under this section must:

(1) provide for investigating and verifying the veteran status of each defendant confined in a state jail felony facility by using data made available from the Veterans Reentry Search Service (VRSS) operated by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or a similar service;

(2) be available to male defendants and, if resources are available, female defendants;

(3) include provisions regarding interviewing and selecting defendants for participation in the program;

(4) allow a defendant to decline participation in the program or to withdraw from the program at any time;

(5) house defendants participating in the program in housing that is designed to mimic the squadron structure familiar to veterans;

(6) coordinate and provide available services and programming approved by the department, including:

(A) individual and group peer support programing, as appropriate;

(B) access to military trauma-informed licensed mental health professional counseling, as appropriate;

(C) evidence-based rehabilitation programming; and

(D) reemployment services; and

(7) to the extent feasible, not later than the 60th day before the date a defendant participating in the program is scheduled for release or discharge from the department:

(A) match the defendant with community-based veteran peer support services to assist the defendant in transitioning into the community; and

(B) transfer the defendant to a state jail felony facility located near the defendant's home community, or the community in which the defendant intends to reside after the defendant's release or discharge, to begin establishing transition relationships with community-based veteran peer support service providers and family members.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 987 (H.B. 865), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2017.